hi_js/english.lexc
!!!english.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +N[gcat] +V[gcat] +Sg[lfea] +Pl[lfea] +PREP[gcat] +ADV[gcat] +A[gcat] +Aux[lfea] +RPRO[gcat] +Relative[lfea] +NEG[gcat]

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;
Preposition ;
Adverb ;
Adjective ;
Pronoun ;
Negation ;

LEXICON Noun

restaurant Ninf;
location Ninf;

LEXICON Verb

show   Vinf;
be	Vinf;
be[stem]+V[gcat]+Sg[lfea]:is #;
be[stem]+V[gcat]+Pl[lfea]:are #;

LEXICON Ninf

[stem]+N[gcat]+Sg[lfea]:0   #;
[stem]+N[gcat]+Pl[lfea]:^s  #;

LEXICON Vinf

[stem]+V[gcat]:0 #;

LEXICON Vaux

[stem]+V[gcat]+Aux[lfea]:0 #;

LEXICON Preposition

in Pinf;
of Pinf;

LEXICON Pinf

[stem]+PREP[gcat]:0 #;

LEXICON Adverb

down Advinf;

LEXICON Advinf

[stem]+ADV[gcat]:0 #;

LEXICON Adjective

first Adjinf;
last Adjinf;

LEXICON Adjinf

[stem]+A[gcat]:0 #;

LEXICON Pronoun

that RPro;

LEXICON RPro

[stem]+RPRO[gcat]+Relative[lfea]:0 #;

LEXICON Negation

not Neg;

LEXICON Neg

[stem]+NEG[gcat]:0 #;
